Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2,128
Code, how construed.

The Nebraska Juvenile Code shall be liberally construed to the end that its purpose may be carried out as provided in section 43-246.

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 64;

Laws 1985, LB 447, § 34.